Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-195
Package; price per pound and total selling price; required.

In addition to the declarations required by section 89-194, any package sold at retail being one of a lot containing random weights of the same commodity shall bear on the outside of the package a plain and conspicuous declaration of the price per pound and the total selling price.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 24.